Utah statutes.
63A-1-111.   Service plans established by each division -- Contents --
Distribution.
(1)  Each division of the department shall formulate and establish service
plans for each fiscal year.
(2)  The service plans shall describe:
(a)  the services to be rendered to state agencies;
(b)  the methods of providing those services;
(c)  the standards of performance; and
(d)  the performance measures used to gauge compliance with those standards.
(3)  Before the beginning of each fiscal year, the service plans shall be
distributed to each state agency and institution that uses the services
provided by that division.
